Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 439 Probation and Parole

439.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

439.020.
Circuit courts may postpone judgment and probate defendant. [Repealed.]

439.030.
Probation officer to investigate defendant — Supervision of probationers by Division of Probation and Parole. [Repealed.]

439.040.
Conditions of probation. [Repealed.]

439.050.
Arrest for violation of probation; revocation on commission of subsequent offense. [Repealed.]

439.060.
Termination of period of probation. [Repealed.]

439.070.
Second-class city police court may suspend sentence. [Repealed.]

439.080.
Probation officer of second-class city. [Repealed.]

439.090.
Suspension of judgment and release of prisoner prohibited after final judgment. [Repealed.]

439.095.
Parole of persons confined in workhouse or penal farm of county containing city of first class. [Repealed.]

439.100.
Parole of prisoners in penitentiary; parole board — Duty of Director of Probation and Parole. [Repealed.]

439.105.
Parole by Commissioner of Welfare during period of National Emergency. [Repealed.]

439.106.
Parole by Governor during period of National Emergency. [Repealed.]

439.110.
Length of time prisoner to serve before parole. [Repealed.]

439.115.
Minimum time before parole under sentences aggregating fifteen years or less. [Repealed.]

439.120.
Rules for prisoners; recommendation for parole; conditions of; things to be supplied to parolee. [Repealed.]

439.125.
Minimum time before parole under sentences aggregating fifteen to twenty-one years. [Repealed.]

439.130.
Employment agents. [Repealed.]

439.135.
Minimum time for parole under life sentences. [Repealed.]

439.140.
Discharge of parolee. [Repealed.]

439.145.
Aggregation of sentences. [Repealed.]

439.150.
Department has control and custody of parolees; final discharge. [Repealed.]

439.155.
Eligibility of prisoner sentenced for crime committed while confined or escaped. [Repealed.]

439.160.
Duty of parolee to report to department. [Repealed.]

439.165.
Provisions of KRS 439.115 to 439.165 apply in all cases. [Repealed.]

439.170.
Parolee need not wear prison identification. [Repealed.]

439.175.
Parole in misdemeanor cases. [Repealed.]

439.177.
Parole privileges for certain misdemeanants — Duties of sentencing judge.

Any misdemeanant may petition the sentencing court for parole privileges.

The sentencing judge shall study the record of all persons petitioning for parole and, in his discretion, may:

Cause additional background or character information to be collected or reduced to writing by the Department of Corrections;

Conduct hearings on the desirability of granting parole;

Impose on the parolee the conditions he sees fit;

Order the granting of parole;

Issue warrants for persons when there is reason to believe they have violated the conditions of their parole and conduct hearings on such matters;

Determine the period of supervision for parolees, which period may be subject to extension or reduction;

Grant final discharge to parolees.

The sentencing judge shall keep a record of his acts, and shall notify the appropriate jail official of his decision relating to the persons who are or have been confined therein.

When an order for parole is issued, it shall recite the conditions thereof, and such orders shall be transmitted to the Department of Corrections.

The period of time spent on parole shall not count as a part of the prisoner’s maximum sentence except in determining the parolee’s eligibility for a final discharge from parole as set out in subsection (7).

Paroled prisoners shall be under the supervision of the department and subject to its decision for the duration of parole. Supervision of the parolee by the Department of Corrections shall cease at the time of recommitment of the prisoner to the jail as a parole violator, or at the time a final discharge from parole is granted by the sentencing judge.

When any paroled prisoner has performed the obligations of his parole during his period of active parole supervision, the sentencing judge may, at the termination of a period to be determined by the sentencing judge, issue a final discharge from parole to the prisoner. Unless ordered earlier by the sentencing judge, a final discharge shall be issued when the prisoner has been out of jail on parole a sufficient period of time to have been eligible for discharge from jail by maximum expiration of sentence had he not been paroled, if before this date he had not absconded from parole supervision or that a warrant for parole violation had not been issued.

The prisoner convicted of a misdemeanor and released on parole under the provisions of this statute shall be subject to all reasonable Department of Corrections regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 294, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 446, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 200, § 9, effective January 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 344, § 35, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 88, effective July 14, 1992.

439.179.
Release of misdemeanants — Purposes for which permitted — Earnings of prisoner, records, and disposition — Authority of District Judge and jailer.

Any person sentenced to a jail for a misdemeanor, nonpayment of a fine or forfeiture, or contempt of court, may be granted the privilege of leaving the jail during necessary and reasonable hours for any of the following purposes:

Seeking employment; or

Working at his employment; or

Conducting his own business or other self-employment occupation including, in the case of a woman, housekeeping and attending the needs of her family; or

Attendance at an educational institution; or

Medical treatment.

Unless the privilege is expressly granted by the court, the prisoner shall be sentenced to ordinary confinement. The prisoner may petition the sentencing court for the privilege at the time of sentence or thereafter, and, in the discretion of the sentencing court, may renew his petition. The sentencing court may withdraw the privilege at any time by order entered with or without notice. The jailer shall advise the court in establishing criteria in determining a prisoner’s eligibility for work release.

The jailer shall notify the Department of Workforce Development, which shall endeavor to secure employment for unemployed prisoners under this section. If a prisoner is employed for wages or salary, they shall, by wage assignment, be turned over to the District Court which shall deposit the same in a trust checking account and shall keep a ledger showing the status of the account of each prisoner. The wages or salary shall not be subject to garnishment of either the employer or the District Court during the prisoner’s term, and shall be disbursed only as provided in this section. For tax purposes they shall be the income of the prisoner.

Every prisoner gainfully employed shall be liable for the cost of his board in the jail, for an amount up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the prisoner’s gross daily wages, not to exceed forty dollars ($40) per day, but not less than twelve dollars ($12) per day, established by the fiscal court of a county or the urban-county council if an urban-county government. If he defaults, his privilege under this section shall be automatically forfeited. All moneys shall be paid directly to the jailer and paid to the county treasury for use on the jail as provided in KRS

441.206

. The fiscal court of a county or the urban-county council if an urban-county government may, by ordinance, provide that the county furnish or pay for the transportation of prisoners employed under this section to and from the place of employment and require that the costs be repaid by the prisoner.

The sentencing court may order the defendant’s employer to deduct from the defendant’s wages or salary payments for the following purposes:

The board of the prisoner and transportation costs incurred by the county;

Support of the prisoner’s dependents, if any;

Payment, either in full or ratably, of the prisoner’s obligations acknowledged by him in writing or which have been reduced to judgment; and

The balance, if any, to the prisoner upon his discharge.

The sentencing court shall not direct that any payment authorized under this section be paid through the circuit clerk.

The Department of Corrections shall, at the request of the District Judge, investigate and report on the amount necessary for the support of the prisoner’s dependents, and periodically review the prisoner’s progress while on leave from the jail and report its findings to the District Judge.

The jailer may refuse to permit the prisoner to exercise his privilege to leave the jail as provided in subsection (1) for any breach of discipline or other violation of jail regulations for a period not to exceed five (5) days.

In counties containing an urban-county form of government, the duties, responsibilities, and obligations vested herein in the Department of Corrections shall be performed by the adult misdemeanant probation and work release agency of the urban-county government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 295, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 106; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 447, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 200, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 300, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 344, § 36, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 385, § 37, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 89, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 368, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 45, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 271, § 27, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 183, § 26, effective August 1, 2002; 2006, ch. 211, § 165, effective July 12, 2006; 2019 ch. 146, § 74, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 236, § 174, effective July 1, 2022.

439.180.
Department to investigate breaches of parole; may summon witnesses. [Repealed.]

439.190.
Reimprisonment of parolee. [Repealed.]

439.200.
Probation and parole officers. [Repealed.]

439.210.
Functions of probation and parole officers. [Repealed.]

439.220.
Information obtained by officers privileged. [Repealed.]

439.230.
Functions of department respecting probation and parole. [Repealed.]

439.240.
Compact with other states for out-of-state parolee supervision. [Repealed.]

439.250.
Definitions for KRS 439.250 to 439.560.

As used in KRS

439.250

to

439.560

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Corrections;

“Department” means the Department of Corrections;

“Deputy commissioner” means the deputy commissioner of the Office of Adult Institutions or the deputy commissioner of the Office of Community Services and Facilities of the Department of Corrections;

“Board” means the Parole Board created by KRS

439.320

;

“Community supervision” means:

The placement of a defendant under supervision with conditions imposed by a court for a specified period during which:

Criminal proceedings are deferred without an adjudication of guilt; or

A sentence of imprisonment or confinement, imprisonment and fine, or confinement and fine, is probated and the imposition of sentence is suspended in whole or in part; or

The placement of an individual under supervision after release from prison or jail, with conditions imposed by the board for a specified period;

“Parole compliance credit” means a credit on a paroled individual’s sentence for program credit, work-for-time credit, educational accomplishment, or meritorious service and shall be calculated pursuant to the applicable provisions in KRS

197.045

and

197.047

;

“Probation program credit” means a credit on the sentence of a supervised individual who is on probation, probation with an alternative sentence, or conditional discharge for educational credit, program completion credit, or work-for-time credit calculated pursuant to KRS

439.268

;

“Supervised compliance credit” means a credit on a paroled individual’s sentence for compliance with supervision that shall be calculated pursuant to KRS

439.345

;

“Positive reinforcement” means any of a wide range of rewards and incentives, including but not limited to awarding certificates of achievement, reducing reporting requirements, deferring a monthly supervision fee payment, removing supervision conditions such as home detention or curfew, or asking the supervised individual to be a mentor to others;

“Probation and parole district supervisor” means the highest ranking field probation or parole administrator in each district; and

“Supervised individual” means an individual placed on probation, probation with an alternative sentence, or conditional discharge by a court or serving a period of parole or post-release supervision from prison or jail.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 1; 1958, ch. 126, § 42; 1962, ch. 106, Art. X, § 10; 1966, ch. 255, § 275; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, §§ 24(16), 28; 1982, ch. 344, § 37, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 90, effective July 14, 1992; 2007, ch. 85, § 318, effective June 26, 2007; 2011, ch. 2, § 29, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 158, § 12, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 44, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

439.260.
Circuit courts may postpone judgment and probate defendant — Supervision of defendant. [Repealed.]

439.265.
Shock probation in felony conviction — Procedure — Exclusions — Comprehensive sex offender presentence evaluation — Exercise of authority.

Subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 439 and Chapters 500 to 534, any Circuit Court may, upon motion of the defendant made not earlier than thirty (30) days nor later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the defendant has been incarcerated in a county jail following his conviction and sentencing pending delivery to the institution to which he has been sentenced, or delivered to the keeper of the institution to which he has been sentenced, suspend the further execution of the sentence and place the defendant on probation upon terms the court determines. Time spent on any form of release following conviction shall not count toward time required under this section.

The court shall consider any motion filed in accordance with subsection (1) of this section within sixty (60) days of the filing date of that motion, and shall enter its ruling within ten (10) days after considering the motion. The defendant may, in the discretion of the trial court, have the right to a hearing on any motion he may file, or have filed for him, that would suspend further execution of sentence. Any court order granting or denying a motion to suspend further execution of sentence is not reviewable.

During the period in which the defendant may file a motion pursuant to this statute, the sentencing judge, within his or her discretion, may order that the defendant be held in a local detention facility that is not at or above maximum capacity until such time as the court rules on said motion. During this period of detention, and prior to the court’s ruling on said motion, the court may require the defendant to participate in any approved community work program or other forms of work release. Persons held in the county jail pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to transfer to a state correctional facility until the decision is made not to place the petitioner on shock probation.

The provisions concerning community work programs or other forms of work release shall apply only to persons convicted of Class C or Class D felonies, and may be granted only after a hearing at which the Commonwealth’s attorney has the opportunity to present arguments in favor or opposition thereto.

If the defendant is a violent offender as defined in KRS

439.3401

, the sentence shall not be probated under this section.

The sentence shall not be probated under this section if the defendant has been convicted of:

A violation of either KRS

507.040

or

507A.040

and a violation of KRS

189A.010

arising out of the same incident; or

A violation of either KRS

507.050

or

507A.050

and a violation of KRS

189A.010

arising out of the same incident.

If the defendant has been convicted of an offense under KRS

510.050

,

510.080

,

530.020

, 530.064(1)(a), or

531.310

, or criminal attempt to commit any of these offenses under KRS

506.010

, the sentence shall not be suspended, in accordance with KRS

532.045

.

When a defendant has been convicted of a sex crime, as defined in KRS

17.500

, the court shall order a comprehensive sex offender presentence evaluation, unless one has been provided within the past six (6) months, in which case the court may order an update of the comprehensive sex offender presentence evaluation of the defendant conducted by the sex offender treatment program operated or approved by the Department of Corrections or the Sex Offender Risk Assessment Advisory Board. The comprehensive sex offender presentence evaluation shall provide to the court a recommendation related to the risk of a repeat offense by the defendant and the defendant’s amenability to treatment, and shall be considered by the court in determining whether to suspend the sentence. If the court suspends the sentence and places the defendant on probation, the provisions of KRS 532.045(3) to (7) shall apply.

The authority granted in this section shall be exercised by the judge who imposed sentence on the defendant, unless he is unable to act and it appears that his inability to act should continue beyond the expiration of the term of the court. In such case, the judge who imposed sentence shall assign a judge to dispose of a motion filed under this section, or as prescribed by the rules and practices concerning the responsibility for disposition of criminal matters.

The provisions of this section shall not apply where a sentence of death has been imposed.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 169, § 1; 1974, ch. 406, § 329; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 7, effective December 22, 1976; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 448, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 153, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 26, § 1, effective February 23, 1984; 1990, ch. 497, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 463, § 63, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 94, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 401, § 33, effective April 11, 2000; 2000, ch. 401, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 182, § 28, effective July 12, 2006; 2017 ch. 90, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

439.267.
Shock probation in misdemeanor convictions — Procedure — Exercise of authority — Availability for sexual offenders.

Subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 439 and Chapters 500 to 534, any District Court, or any Circuit Court with respect to a defendant convicted in Circuit Court of a misdemeanor, may, upon motion of the defendant made not earlier than thirty (30) days after the defendant has been delivered to the keeper of the institution to which he has been sentenced, suspend the further execution of the sentence and place the defendant on probation upon terms as the court determines.

The court shall consider any motion filed in accordance with subsection (1) of this section within sixty (60) days of the filing date of that motion, and shall enter its ruling within ten (10) days after considering the motion. The defendant may, in the discretion of the trial court, have the right to a hearing on any motion he may file, or have filed for him, that would suspend further execution of sentence. Any court order granting or denying a motion to suspend further execution of sentence is not reviewable.

The authority granted in this section shall be exercised by the judge who imposed sentence on the defendant, unless he is unable to act and it appears that his inability to act should continue beyond the expiration of the term of the court. In this case, the judge who imposed sentence shall assign a judge to dispose of a motion filed under this section, or as prescribed by the rules and practices concerning the responsibility for disposition of criminal matters.

If the defendant has been convicted of a misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510, or criminal attempt to commit any of these offenses under KRS

506.010

, prior to considering the motion to suspend the sentence, the court may, for a misdemeanor offense specified herein, and shall, for any felony offense specified in this subsection order an evaluation of the defendant to be conducted by the sex offender treatment program operated or approved by the Department of Corrections or the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities. The evaluation shall provide to the court a recommendation related to the risk of a repeat offense by the defendant and the defendant’s amenability to treatment, and shall be considered by the court in determining whether to suspend the sentence. If the court suspends the sentence and places the defendant on probation, the provisions of KRS 532.045(3) to (7) shall apply.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 153, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 94, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2012, ch. 146, § 117, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 75, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2012). This statute was amended by 2012 Ky. Acts chs. 146 and 158, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

439.268.
Probation program credits.

Any supervised individual on probation, probation with an alternative sentence, or conditional discharge shall receive credit on his or her sentence for:

Successfully receiving a High School Equivalency Diploma or a high school diploma, a college degree, a completed vocational or technical education program, or a correspondence postsecondary education program which results in a diploma or degree, as defined and approved by the department in the amount of ninety (90) days per diploma, degree, or vocational or technical education program completed;

Successfully completing a drug treatment program, evidence-based program, or any other promising practice or life skills program approved by the department, in the amount of not more than ninety (90) days for each program completed. The department shall determine criteria to establish whether a life skills or promising practice program is eligible for probation program credits. Programs shall demonstrate learning of skills necessary for reintegration into the community to minimize barriers to successful reentry. Approval of programs shall be subject to review by the department; and

Work-for-time credit, which shall be applied for any public employment, at the same rates as calculated pursuant to KRS

197.047

.

Probation program credits earned pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be applied to reduce the period of probation, probation with an alternative sentence, or conditional discharge ordered by the sentencing court.

No less than ninety (90) days before the projected date of final discharge, the department shall notify the sentencing court of probation program credits awarded pursuant to this section and that the period of supervision is reduced by the number of days of probation program credits earned by the supervised individual, and the impending discharge from supervision. If the sentencing court, upon receiving such notice does not take any action pursuant to KRS

533.020

, the offender shall be discharged.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations for the awarding of probation program credits.

For supervised individuals on supervision prior to July 15, 2020, probation program credits shall begin to accrue on the first day of the first month after July 15, 2020.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

439.270.
Period of probation. [Repealed.]

439.280.
Investigation by probation officer. [Repealed.]

439.290.
Conditions of probation. [Repealed.]

439.300.
Arrest of probationer — Revocation of probation, when. [Repealed.]

439.302.
Commission on Correction and Community Service — Appointment — Terms — Expenses. [Repealed.]

439.304.
Meetings, powers, and duties of commission. [Repealed.]

439.306.
Authority of commission and members. [Repealed.]

439.310.
Administration of probation and parole laws.

The commissioner, with the approval of the secretary and the Governor, shall appoint a person charged with the administration of probation and parole laws, who, with the approval of the commissioner, shall appoint a number of probation and parole officers and other employees sufficient to administer the provisions of KRS

439.250

to

439.560

; but no employee shall be appointed except in the manner hereinafter provided. The person charged with the administration of probation and parole laws shall have attained at least a bachelor’s degree from an accredited college, and, in addition, shall be a person with training and experience in probation, parole or other related form of welfare work.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 101, § 7, effective May 18, 1956; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 26; 1980, ch. 208, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 344, § 41, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 94, effective July 14, 1992.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The position of probation and parole officer in the state department of welfare must be considered a state office or deputy state office which would make it incompatible with the office of mayor, which is a municipal office.

OAG 60-57

.

Probation and parole officers when engaged in the discharge of official duties involving probation and parole violators or entailing the maintenance of custody over any prisoner, or when necessary for their protection in the discharge of their official duties, are empowered by KRS

527.020

to carry concealed deadly weapons on or about their persons.

OAG 75-87

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Department of Corrections, KRS

196.075

.

439.3101.
Administrative regulations requiring supervision and treatment in accordance with evidence-based practices.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations that require the supervision and treatment of supervised individuals in accordance with evidence-based practices.

The administrative regulations shall, at a minimum, include:

The administration of a validated risk and needs assessment on all supervised individuals at regular intervals to determine their criminal risk factors and to identify intervention targets;

Use of assessment scores and other objective criteria throughout the period of community supervision to determine the risk level and program needs of each supervised individual;

Caseload size guidelines that are based on supervised individuals’ risk levels and take into account department resources and employee workload and prioritization of supervision and program resources for supervised individuals who are at higher risk to reoffend;

Definitions of various risk levels to apply to supervised individuals during the period of community supervision;

Development of a case plan for each individual who is assessed to be moderate-to-high risk based on the risk and needs assessment, that targets the criminal risk factors identified in the assessment, is responsive to individual characteristics, and provides supervision of offenders according to that case plan;

Implementation of swift, certain, proportionate, and graduated sanctions that a probation and parole officer shall apply in response to a supervised individual’s noncompliant behaviors; and

Establishment of protocols and standards that assess the degree to which policies, procedures, programs, interventions, and practices relating to offender recidivism reduction, whether utilized by the department or contract or referral agencies, are evidence-based.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 51, effective June 8, 2011.

439.3102.
Training and professional development for department personnel concerning implementation of evidence-based practices.

The department shall provide its employees with intensive initial and on-going training and professional development services to support the implementation of evidence-based practices.

The training and professional development services shall include assessment techniques, case planning, risk reduction and intervention strategies, effective communication skills, cognitive-behavioral treatment, substance abuse, and other topics identified by the department or its employees.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 52, effective June 8, 2011.

439.3103.
Annual report on efforts to implement evidence-based practices to reduce recidivism.

By December 1 of each year, beginning in 2012, the department shall submit to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Chief Justice a comprehensive report on its efforts to implement evidence-based practices to reduce recidivism. The report shall include at a minimum:

The percentage of supervised individuals being supervised in accordance with evidence-based practices;

The percentage of state moneys expended by the department for programs that are evidence based, and a list of all programs with identification of which are evidence based;

Specification of supervision policies, procedures, programs, and practices that were created, modified, or eliminated; and

The department’s recommendations for resource allocation, and any additional collaboration with other state, regional, or local public agencies, private entities, or faith-based and community organizations.

The department shall make the full report and an executive summary available to the general public on its Web site.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 53, effective June 8, 2011.

439.3104.
Duties of department concerning risk and needs assessment instrument.

The department shall:

Conduct an initial administration of a validated risk and needs assessment instrument on an individual upon intake to community supervision, unless an initial assessment has been previously conducted within a reasonable time period as specified in department regulations;

While the individual is on community supervision, readminister the risk and needs assessment at regular intervals as determined by administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS

439.3101

;

Apply the results of the risk and needs assessment to:

Establish an appropriate level of supervision;

Determine the content of a case plan that addresses the supervised individual’s criminal needs; and

Respond to compliant and noncompliant behavior; and

Promulgate administrative regulations to determine appropriate levels of supervision, guidelines for case planning, and guidelines for responses to specified behavior by supervised individuals.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 54, effective June 8, 2011.

439.3105.
Administrative caseload supervision program for supervised offenders — Administrative regulations.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of this section to establish an administrative caseload supervision program for supervised individuals whose results from a risk and needs assessment indicate that they are low-risk offenders.

The administrative caseload supervision program shall consist of monitoring supervised individuals to ensure that they have not engaged in new criminal activity and are fulfilling financial obligations to the court.

If a supervised individual on administrative caseload supervision:

Does not fulfill his or her restitution or other financial obligations to the court, he or she may be placed on a higher level of supervision at the discretion of the department;

Engages in criminal activity, he or she may be prosecuted, revoked, or placed on a higher level of supervision; or

Exhibits signs or symptoms of a substance abuse disorder, he or she may be assessed by the Administrative Office of the Courts drug court personnel for consideration of admission into drug court.

A supervised individual on a higher level of supervision who demonstrates a reduction in criminal risk factors upon reassessment and who has achieved the goals established in his or her case plan may be placed on administrative caseload supervision at the discretion of the department.

A supervised individual on a higher level of supervision shall presumptively be placed on administrative supervision if he or she has:

Completed twelve (12) months of community supervision;

Not violated the terms of his or her community supervision in the previous twelve (12) months;

Fulfilled all restitution and other financial obligations to the court;

Demonstrated a reduction in criminal risk factors upon reassessment; and

Achieved the goals established in his or her case plan.

If the conditions or level of community supervision of a probationer are modified under this section, the probation and parole officer shall file a copy of the modified conditions or level with the sentencing court.

The department may establish by administrative regulation conditions for overriding presumptive administrative supervision.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 58, effective June 8, 2011.

439.3106.
Sanctions to which supervised individuals are subject.

Supervised individuals shall be subject to:

Violation revocation proceedings and possible incarceration for failure to comply with the conditions of supervision when such failure constitutes a significant risk to prior victims of the supervised individual or the community at large, and cannot be appropriately managed in the community; or

Sanctions other than revocation and incarceration as appropriate to the severity of the violation behavior, the risk of future criminal behavior by the offender, and the need for, and availability of, interventions which may assist the offender to remain compliant and crime-free in the community.

At a final revocation hearing, the board may subject a supervised individual to a supervision continuation sanction for a period of up to nine (9) months, or until the completion of the individual’s sentence, whichever is shorter.

Individuals under a supervision continuation sanction shall be placed in:

A state or local correctional or detention facility;

An inpatient program for substance abuse treatment which has been approved by the department; or

Notwithstanding KRS

532.100

, a halfway house, when the individuals have been classified by the department as community custody.

Individuals under a supervision continuation sanction shall be considered inmates for the duration of the supervision continuation sanction period. If an individual under a supervision continuation sanction successfully completes the sanction and has not completed the individual’s sentence, the individual shall then be considered a supervised individual.

When a supervised individual has successfully completed the supervision continuation sanction and has not completed the individual’s sentence, the individual shall be:

Reinstated to supervision in the community without another hearing before the board; and

Subject to the same supervision conditions that the individual had been under at the time of the probable cause revocation hearing.

When a supervised individual does not successfully complete a supervision continuation sanction and has not completed the individual’s sentence, the individual shall be returned to the board for revocation proceedings.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 59, effective June 8, 2011; 2019 ch. 137, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 44, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.

439.3107.
System of graduated sanctions for violations of conditions of community supervision — Administrative regulations.

The department shall, by January 1, 2012, adopt a system of graduated sanctions for violations of conditions of community supervision. Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 533, the system shall set forth a menu of presumptive sanctions for the most common types of supervision violations, including but not limited to: failure to report; failure to pay fines, fees, and victim restitution; failure to participate in a required program or service; failure to complete community service; violation of a protective or no contact order; and failure to refrain from the use of alcohol or controlled substances. The system of sanctions shall take into account factors such as the severity of the current violation, the supervised individual’s previous criminal record, the number and severity of any previous supervision violations, the supervised individual’s assessed risk level, and the extent to which graduated sanctions were imposed for previous violations. The system also shall define positive reinforcements that supervised individuals may receive for compliance with conditions of supervision.

The department shall establish by administrative regulation an administrative process to review and approve or reject, prior to imposition, graduated sanctions that deviate from those prescribed.

The department shall establish by administrative regulation an administrative process to review graduated sanctions contested by supervised individuals under KRS

439.3108

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 60, effective June 8, 2011.